sl-SI: Oblika čopiča za slikanje: Kotni; Svetel; Pahljača; Filbert; Ploščat; Rigger; Okrogla; Trikoten; Drugo
pl: Projekt pędzla: Kąt; Jasny; Wentylator; Leszczyna; Płaski; Monter konstrukcji stalowych; Runda; Trójkąt; Inne
pt-PT: Design de pincel/trincha de pintura: Angular; Espatulado curto; Leque; Língua de gato; Plano; Ponta extra fina; Redondo; Triângulo; Outro
nl: Verfborstelontwerp: Hoek; Helder; Ventilator; Filbert; Vlak; Rigger; Rond; Triangel; Andere
hr-HR: Dizajn kista: Kutni; Svijetli; Lepezasti; Filbert; Ravni; Kist za linije; Okrugli; Trokutasti; Ostalo
de: Pinseldesign: Schrägschnitt; Bright; Fächer; Filbert; Flach; Schlepper; Rund; Dreieck; Sonstiges
fr: Design du pinceau: En angle; Brillant; Ventilateur; Aveline; Plate; Gréeur; Rond; Triangle; Autre
ro-RO: Design pensulă: Unghiulară; Cu peri scurți, plați; Evantai; Filbert; Plată; Pensulă; Rotundă; Triunghiulară; Altele
sv: Penseldesign: Vinkel; Ljus; Fläkt; Filbert; Platt; Rigger; Rund; Triangel; Övrigt
zh-TW: 畫筆設計: 角度; 明亮; 扇型; 榛子; 平坦; 極尖極細; 圓頭; 三角; 其他
tr: Boya Fırçası Tasarımı: Açı; Parlak; Fan; Fındık; Düz; Fırça; Yuvarlak; Üçgen; Diğer
ja: ペイントブラシのデザイン: アングル; ブライト; ファン; フィルバート; フラット; リガー; ラウンド; 三角形; その他
da: Design til malerpensel: Vinkel; Lys; Vifte; Filbert; Flad; Rigger; Rund; Trekant; Andet
lt-LT: Dažų teptuko forma: Lenkti; Ryškūss; Vėduoklės formos; Filbertas; Plokščias; Ilgais plaukeliais; Apvalus; Trikampio formos kaušeliais; Kita
es: Diseño de brocha de pintura: Ángulo; Brillante; Ventilador; Filbert; Puro; Aparejador; Redondo; Triangular; Otros
ko: 페인트 브러시 디자인: 각도; 밝기; 팬; 필버트; 플랫; 리거; 라운드; 삼각; 기타
th: การออกแบบแปรงทาสี: หน้าตัดเฉียง; ปลายแบนขนสั้น; ทรงพัด; ขนแข็ง; ราบ; ริกเกอร์; ทรงกลม; สามเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
it: Forma del pennello: Angolo; Piatto corto; Ventola; Lingua di gatto; Piatto; Rigger; Rotondo; Triangolo; Altro
el: Σχέδιο πινέλου: Γωνιακή; Φωτεινό; Τύπου βεντάλιας; Φίλμπερτ; Επίπεδη; Μακρύτριχο; Στρογγυλό; Τριγωνικό; Άλλο
zh-CN: 画笔设计: 角度; 明亮; 风扇; 榛子; 扁平的; 起重工; 圆头; 三角形; 其他
vi: Loại cọ sơn: Đầu vát; Đầu vuông; Đầu xòe; Đầu oval; Phẳng; Đầu dài; Mũi giày tròn; Hình tam giác; Khác
pt-BR: Formato do pincel: Ângulo; Brilhante; Ventilador; Avelã; Plana; Rigger; Redondo; Triângulo; Outro
sk-SK: Dizajn štetca: Uhol; Svetlý; Ventilátor; Filbert; Plochý; Rigger; Okrúhly; Trojuholník; Iné
ru: Конструкция кисти: Скошенная; Яркий; Веерная; Филберт; Плоская; Риггер; Круглая; Треугольная; Другая
bg-BG: Дизайн на четка за рисуване: Ъгъл; Ярък; Вентилатор; Филбърт; Плоскa; Монтажник; Кръгла; Триъгълник; Други
nb: Penseldesign: Vinkel; Lys; Vifte; Filbert; Flat; Rigger; Rund; Trekant; Annet
en: Paint brush design: Angle; Bright; Fan; Filbert; Flat; Rigger; Round; Triangle; Other
fi: Siveltimen muotoilu: Kulma; Kirkas; Viuhka; Filbert; Tasainen; Pitkä; Pyöreä; Kolmio; Muu
cs: Design štětce: Úhlový; Jasný; Vějířový; Filbert; Plochý; Rigger; Oválná; Trojúhelník; Jiné
hu: Festőecset kialakítása: Hegyes; Fényes; Legyező; Mogyoró; Lapos; Árboc; Kerek; Háromszög alakú; Egyéb